Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-856
Act; provisions controlling.

To the extent that the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act is inconsistent with the provisions of any general statute or special act or parts thereof, the Nebraska Educational, Health, Cultural, and Social Services Finance Authority Act shall be deemed controlling.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 53;

Laws 1993, LB 465, § 31;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2953;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 53;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1753;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 56;

Laws 2019, LB224, § 34.